Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1860.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.26, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Caller identification service. new text end new text begin "Caller identification service" means a feature that displays a caller's name, phone number, or location on a call recipient's telephone or wireless communications device before the call is answered. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.26, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Commission. new text end new text begin "Commission" means the Public Utilities Commission. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.26, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Telecommunications service provider. new text end new text begin "Telecommunications service provider" has the meaning given in section 237.01, subdivision 6b. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [325E.281] FALSE CALLER IDENTIFICATION INFORMATION; PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) It is unlawful to display or cause to be displayed, or to use a third party to display or cause to be displayed, on a Minnesota resident's caller identification service (1) a fraudulent or inaccurate name or telephone number, or (2) the name or telephone number of the recipient of the telecommunication. new text end new text begin (b) This subdivision does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) the transmission of a caller identification service by a telecommunications provider that has received a commission determination that the telecommunications service provider complies with subdivision 2, based on the telecommunications service provider's most recent filing made under subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) a lawful, authorized investigative, protective, or intelligence activity of a law enforcement agency of a state, a political subdivision of a state, or the United States; new text end new text begin (3) an activity engaged in under a court order that specifically authorizes the use of caller identification manipulation; new text end new text begin (4) caller identification manipulation used by a domestic violence shelter to protect the safety of the domestic violence shelter's residents; new text end new text begin (5) a telecommunications service provider that blocks or restricts a name, phone number, or location from being displayed on a subscriber's caller identification service; or new text end new text begin (6) a health care professional contacting a patient, a patient's legal representative, or a patient's family member regarding the patient's diagnosis, treatment, or services. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Call blocking by telecommunications providers; annual certification. new text end new text begin (a) A telecommunications service provider serving subscribers in Minnesota must annually file with the commission evidence, as required by the commission, that the telecommunications service provider has implemented current and applicable technologies that identify and block telecommunications that violate this section for all of the telecommunications service provider's Minnesota subscribers and at no cost to the Minnesota subscribers, taking into consideration applicable state and federal laws and regulations, agreements that the telecommunications service provider has entered into with state or federal authorities with respect to the implementation of blocking fictitious or misleading names or telephone numbers on a subscriber's caller identification service, and costs. new text end new text begin (b) A subscriber may elect to opt out of a telecommunications service provider's call blocking service. new text end new text begin (c) A telecommunications service provider must fulfill a subscriber's oral or written request to block transmission of calls originating from a specific telephone number within 20 days of receiving the request. A telecommunications service provider may charge a fee to a subscriber that receives the service under this paragraph. new text end new text begin (d) The commission must develop policies and procedures to assist in making a determination regarding a telecommunications service provider's compliance with paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (e) The state of Minnesota is prohibited from entering into a contract with a telecommunications service provider that the commission determines does not comply with this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [325E.3105] ENFORCEMENT; REMEDIES. new text end new text begin (a) A violation of sections 325E.27 to 325E.30 is a felony. new text end new text begin (b) Sections 325E.27 to 325E.30 may be enforced by the commissioner of commerce under section 45.027, or by the attorney general under section 8.31. new text end new text begin (c) A person convicted of a violation under sections 325E.27 to 325E.30 may be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $....... for each separate violation, except that if the prohibited call resulted in identity theft or theft by swindle, the person is subject to the penalty provided under section 609.52, subdivision 3, clause (3). new text end new text begin (d) A subscriber aggrieved by a violation of sections 325E.27 to 325E.30 has a private right of action under this section and may seek appropriate injunctive or other equitable relief, additional civil damages, actual losses, and, as determined by the court, reasonable attorney fees and court costs. A private right of action brought under this section by a subscriber is in the public interest. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this section limits any remedies, causes of action, or penalties available to a person or government agency under any other federal or state law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.52, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Sentence. Whoever commits theft may be sentenced as follows: (1) to imprisonment for not more than 20 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $100,000, or both, if the property is a firearm, or the value of the property or services stolen is more than $35,000 and the conviction is for a violation of subdivision 2, clause (3), (4), (15), (16), or (19), or section 609.2335, subdivision 1, clause (1) or (2), item (i); or (2) to imprisonment for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both, if the value of the property or services stolen exceeds $5,000, or if the property stolen was an article representing a trade secret, an explosive or incendiary device, or a controlled substance listed in Schedule I or II pursuant to section 152.02 with the exception of marijuana; or (3) to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if any of the following circumstances exist: (a) the value of the property or services stolen is more than $1,000 but not more than $5,000; or (b) the property stolen was a controlled substance listed in Schedule III, IV, or V pursuant to section 152.02; or (c) the value of the property or services stolen is more than $500 but not more than $1,000 and the person has been convicted within the preceding five years for an offense under this section, section 256.98; 268.182; 609.24; 609.245; 609.247; 609.522; 609.53; 609.582, subdivision 1, 2, or 3; 609.625; 609.63; 609.631; or 609.821, or a statute from another state, the United States, or a foreign jurisdiction, in conformity with any of those sections, and the person received a felony or gross misdemeanor sentence for the offense, or a sentence that was stayed under section 609.135 if the offense to which a plea was entered would allow imposition of a felony or gross misdemeanor sentence; or (d) the value of the property or services stolen is not more than $1,000, and any of the following circumstances exist: (i) the property is taken from the person of another or from a corpse, or grave or coffin containing a corpse; or (ii) the property is a record of a court or officer, or a writing, instrument or record kept, filed or deposited according to law with or in the keeping of any public officer or office; or (iii) the property is taken from a burning, abandoned, or vacant building or upon its removal therefrom, or from an area of destruction caused by civil disaster, riot, bombing, or the proximity of battle; or (iv) the property consists of public funds belonging to the state or to any political subdivision or agency thereof; or (v) the property stolen is a motor vehicle; or new text begin (vi) the property was obtained through a violation of subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (4), that occurred as a result of a telecommunication prohibited under sections 325E.27 to 325E.29; or new text end (4) to imprisonment for not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $3,000, or both, if the value of the property or services stolen is more than $500 but not more than $1,000; or (5) in all other cases where the value of the property or services stolen is $500 or less, to imprisonment for not more than 90 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $1,000, or both, provided, however, in any prosecution under subdivision 2, clauses (1), (2), (3), (4), (13), and (19), the value of the money or property or services received by the defendant in violation of any one or more of the above provisions within any six-month period may be aggregated and the defendant charged accordingly in applying the provisions of this subdivision; provided that when two or more offenses are committed by the same person in two or more counties, the accused may be prosecuted in any county in which one of the offenses was committed for all of the offenses aggregated under this paragraph. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.527, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Penalties. A person who violates subdivision 2 may be sentenced as follows: (1) if the offense involves a single direct victim and the total, combined loss to the direct victim and any indirect victims is $250 or less, the person may be sentenced as provided in section 609.52, subdivision 3, clause (5); (2) if the offense involves a single direct victim and the total, combined loss to the direct victim and any indirect victims is more than $250 but not more than $500, the person may be sentenced as provided in section 609.52, subdivision 3, clause (4); (3) if the offense involves two or three direct victims or the total, combined loss to the direct and indirect victims is more than $500 but not more than $2,500, the person may be sentenced as provided in section 609.52, subdivision 3, clause (3); (4) if the offense involves more than three but not more than seven direct victims, or if the total combined loss to the direct and indirect victims is more than $2,500, the person may be sentenced as provided in section 609.52, subdivision 3, clause (2); (5) if the offense involves eight or more direct victims, or if the total, combined loss to the direct and indirect victims is more than $35,000, the person may be sentenced as provided in section 609.52, subdivision 3, clause (1); deleted text begin anddeleted text end (6) if the offense is related to possession or distribution of pornographic work in violation of section 617.246 or 617.247, the person may be sentenced as provided in section 609.52, subdivision 3, clause (1)deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (7) if the offense is accomplished by a telecommunication prohibited under sections 325E.27 to 325E.29, the offense is a felony regardless of the number of victims or the value of the loss to the victims and the person may be sentenced as provided under section 609.52, subdivision 3, clause (3). new text end Sec. 8. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.31, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-02681 325E.31 REMEDIES. (a) A person who is found to have violated sections 325E.27 to 325E.30 is subject to the penalties and remedies, including a private right of action to recover damages, as provided in section 8.31. (b) In addition to the penalties and remedies under paragraph (a), the attorney general is entitled to sue for and recover on behalf of the state a civil penalty from a person found to have violated sections 325E.27 to 325E.30. The court must determine the civil penalty amount, which must not exceed $50,000.